Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4101 of Title 69, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Department of Transportation shall erect
signage designating the following roads as the True Grit Trail:
beginning at U.S. Highway 64 at the Oklahoma-Arkansas state line to
U.S. Highway 59; from U.S. Highway 59 to U.S. Highway 271; from U.S.
Highway 271 to the town of Spiro; from Spiro back to U.S. Highway
59; from U.S. Highway 59 to State Highway 31; from State Highway 31
to U.S. Highway 270; from U.S. Highway 270 to Main Street in
McAlester; from Main Street to East Krebs Avenue; from East Krebs
Avenue and Main Street back to U.S. Highway 270; from U.S. Highway
270 to State Highway 2; from State Highway 2 to Robbers Cave State
Park; from Robbers Cave State Park on State Highway 2 to U.S.
Highway 270; from U.S. Highway 270 to State Highway 82; from State
Highway 82 to U.S. Highway 271; from U.S. Highway 271 to State
Highway 1; and from State Highway 1 and ending at the intersection
of State Highway 1 and U.S. Highway 259.

B. The Department of Transportation shall erect informational
highway signage designed or approved by the Oklahoma Tourism and
Recreation Department to direct visitors to sites of significant
interest along the True Grit Trail, including:
1. The city of Sallisaw;
2. The town of Spiro;
3. The town of Bokoshe;
4. The town of McCurtain;
5. The town of Kinta;
6. The town of Quinton;
7. The city of Krebs;
8. The city of McAlester;
9. The city of Hartshorne;
10. The city of Wilburton;
11. Robbers Cave State Park;
12. The town of Red Oak;
13. The town of Bengal;
14. The town of Talihina; and
15. The Talimena National Scenic Byway.
C. The Department of Transportation shall collaborate with the
Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department to maintain online
resources for the True Grit Trail, including, but not limited to:
1. A map of the True Grit Trail;
2. Information about each site of significant interest
identified in this act; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1411 Page 2

3. Historical context regarding the True Grit Trail.
D. The cost associated with signage required by this act shall
be funded from private sources and may include the cost of the
initial erection of signs as well as the cost of potential
replacement or reconstruction of signs. Upon receiving adequate
funding, the Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers to be placed as required by this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1411 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of February,
2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 15th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1411 Page 4